Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 20. Virginia Commission on Youth.

§ 30-174.
Virginia Commission on Youth; purpose; membership; terms; compensation and expenses; quorum; voting on recommendations.

The Virginia Commission on Youth (the Commission) is established in the legislative branch of state government. The purpose of the Commission shall be to study and provide recommendations addressing the needs of and services to the Commonwealth’s youth and their families. In so doing, it shall encourage the development of uniform policies and services to youth across the Commonwealth and provide a forum for continuing review and study of such services. In addition to its own proposals, the Commission shall coordinate the proposals and recommendations of all commissions and agencies as to legislation affecting youth.

The Commission shall consist of 12 members to be appointed as follows: six members of the House of Delegates to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates; three members of the Senate to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; and three nonlegislative citizen members to be appointed by the Governor. Nonlegislative citizen members shall be citizens of the Commonwealth.

Legislative members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Nonlegislative citizen members shall serve four-year terms. Members may be reappointed for successive terms. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The Commission shall elect its chairman and vice-chairman annually. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

Members of the Commission shall receive compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. However, all such compensation and expense payments shall come from existing appropriations to the Commission.

No recommendation of the Commission shall be adopted if a majority of the Senate members or a majority of the House members appointed to the Commission (i) vote against the recommendation and (ii) vote for the recommendation to fail notwithstanding the majority vote of the Commission.

History.

1989, c. 189, §§ 9-292, 9-293; 1992, c. 778; 2001, c. 844; 2004, c. 1000.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 778, cl. 2 provides: “that whenever any reference is made in law or other provision approved by the General Assembly to the former Youth Services Commission, such reference shall be construed to apply to the Virginia Commission on Youth.”

Acts 2014, c. 770, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Virginia Commission on Youth, in consultation with the Department of Education and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall review (i) statewide policies and regulations related to seclusion and restraint in public and private elementary and secondary schools and (ii) methods used in other states to reduce and eliminate the use of seclusion and restraint in public and private elementary and secondary schools. The Virginia Commission on Youth shall make recommendations for the modernization of Virginia’s policies and regulations related to seclusion and restraint in schools and submit its recommendations no later than November 30, 2014, to the General Assembly. The Virginia Commission on Youth shall report its findings to the Governor and the 2015 Regular Session of the General Assembly.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000, in subsection B, substituted “12” for “twelve” and “Committee on Rules” for “Committee on Privileges and Elections,” inserted “nonlegislative,” and added the last sentence; rewrote subsection C; in subsection D, inserted “and vice-chairman” in the first sentence and added the last sentence; in subsection E, in the first sentence, substituted “performance” for “discharge” and inserted “§

2.2-2813

and” and “compensation and” in the last sentence; and added subsection F.

§ 30-175.
Powers and duties of the Commission.

The Commission shall have the power and duty to:

Undertake studies and to gather information and data in order to accomplish its purposes as set forth in § 30-174, and to formulate and report its recommendations to the General Assembly and the Governor. The chairman of the Commission shall submit to the General Assembly and the Governor an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of the Commission no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

At the direction or request of the legislature by concurrent resolution or of the Governor, or at the request of any department, board, bureau, commission, authority or other agency created by the Commonwealth or to which the Commonwealth is a party, study the operations, management, jurisdiction or powers of any such department, board, bureau, commission, authority or other agency which has responsibility for services to youth.

History.

1989, c. 189, § 9-294; 1992, c. 778; 2001, c. 844; 2004, c. 1000.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 rewrote subdivision 1; and inserted “a” preceding “party, study” in subdivision 2.

§ 30-176.
Executive director; staff; compensation.

The Commission may appoint and employ and, at its pleasure, remove an executive director and such other persons as it deems necessary to assist it in carrying out its duties as set forth in this chapter. The Commission may determine the duties of such staff and fix their salaries or compensation within the amounts appropriated therefor.

History.

1989, c. 189, § 9-295; 2001, c. 844.

§ 30-177.
Cooperation of other state agencies.

The Commission may request and shall receive from every department, division, board, bureau, commission, authority or other agency created by the Commonwealth, or to which the Commonwealth is party, or from any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, cooperation and assistance in the performance of its duties.

History.

1989, c. 189, § 9-296; 2001, c. 844.